Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5807
Report; contents; joint hearing.

No later than October 31 of each year, the Tax Commissioner shall prepare a report stating the total amount of credits claimed on income tax returns or as refunds of sales and use tax during the previous fiscal year. The report shall be on a fiscal year, accrual basis that satisfies the requirements set by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board. The Department of Revenue shall, on or before December 15 of each even-numbered year, appear at a joint hearing of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and the Revenue Committee of the Legislature and present the report. Any supplemental information requested by three or more committee members shall be presented within thirty days after the request. No information shall be provided in the report that is protected by state or federal confidentiality laws.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 65;

Laws 2013, LB612, § 8;

Laws 2022, LB1150, § 14.